Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.090

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Grounds.

The secretary shall refuse to issue an aircraft dealer's license or shall suspend or revoke an aircraft dealer's license whenever he or she has reasonable grounds to believe that the dealer has:

(1) Forged or altered any federal certificate, permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of an aircraft;

(2) Sold or disposed of an aircraft which he or she knows or has reason to know has been stolen or appropriated without the consent of the owner;

(3) Willfully misrepresented any material fact in the application for an aircraft dealer's license, aircraft dealer's certificate, or registration certificate;

(4) Willfully withheld or caused to be withheld from a purchaser of an aircraft any document referred to in subsection (1) of this section if applicable, or an affidavit to the effect that there are no liens, mortgages, or encumbrances of any type on the aircraft other than noted thereon, if the document or affidavit has been requested by the purchaser;

(5) Suffered or permitted the cancellation of his or her bond or the exhaustion of the penalty thereof;

(6) Used an aircraft dealer's certificate for any purpose other than those permitted by this chapter or RCW 47.68.250 and 82.48.100;

(7) Except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, been adjudged guilty of a crime that directly relates to the business of an aircraft dealer and the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or had a judgment entered against the dealer within the preceding five years in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion. For the purpose of this section, the term "adjudged guilty" means, in addition to a final conviction in either a state or municipal court, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea of guilty, or a finding of guilt regardless of whether the imposition of the sentence is deferred or the penalty is suspended.

[ 2016 c 81 s 5; 2010 c 8 s 5012; 1984 c 7 s 16; 1983 c 135 s 3; 1983 c 3 s 18; 1955 c 150 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.